Hawaii, session 2025, SB774.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter Office of gun violence prevention §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Director" means the director of the office of gun violence prevention. "Office" means the office of gun violence prevention. §   -2  Office of gun violence prevention; established.  (a)  There is established within the department of law enforcement, for administrative purposes only, an office of gun violence prevention. (b)  The head of the office of gun violence prevention shall be known as the director of the office of gun violence prevention and shall be appointed by the governor pursuant to section 26-34. (c)  The director shall be responsible for: (1)  Serving as the principal officer in state government responsible for the performance, development, and control of programs, policies, and activities under the jurisdiction of the office; (2)  Administering funds allocated for the office and applying for, receiving, and disbursing grants and donations from all sources for gun violence prevention; (3)  Assessing the policies and practices of other state and county agencies relating to gun violence prevention; and (4)  Advising state and county agencies on new legislation, programs, and policy initiatives relating to gun violence prevention. (d)  The office of gun violence prevention shall: (1)  Conduct public awareness campaigns in a culturally appropriate manner to educate Hawaii residents about state and federal laws and existing resources relating to gun violence prevention, including but not limited to: (A)  Safe and responsible gun ownership; (B)  Reporting of lost or stolen firearms, including any state reporting requirements; (C)  Best practices for safe storage of firearms; (D)  Filing and obtaining orders of protection; and (E)  Accessing available mental health and substance use resources; (2)  Administer a grant program for organizations to conduct community-based gun violence intervention initiatives focused on interrupting cycles of gun violence, trauma, and retaliation that are evidence-informed and have demonstrated promise at reducing gun violence without contributing to mass incarceration; (3)  Create and maintain a resource bank as a repository for data, research, and statistical information regarding gun violence in Hawaii; and (4)  Develop a plan to address gun violence in Hawaii and coordinate, improve, and expand upon existing plans for gun violence prevention. (e)  The office may collaborate with any other state or county agency to fulfill the purposes of this chapter. §   -3  Grant program.  (a)  There is established a gun violence prevention grant program to be developed and administered by the office of gun violence prevention.  Subject to availability of funds, the office shall award grants to organizations to conduct community-based gun violence intervention initiatives. (b) The office shall develop criteria for the awarding of grants and shall establish standards, policies, and procedures for the administration of the gun violence prevention grant program. §   - 4  Gun violence prevention special fund. (a)  There is established in the state treasury the gun violence prevention special fund, to be administered by the office of gun violence prevention, into which shall be deposited all moneys received by the office in the form of: (1)  Grants; (2)  Donations; and (3)  Appropriations made by the legislature to the fund. (b)  The office shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session on the sources of moneys deposited into the fund and expenditures of moneys from the fund. §   -5  Gun violence resource bank; duties.  (a)  The office shall create and maintain a resource bank of regularly updated and accurate materials and resources as a repository for data, research, and statistical information regarding gun violence in the State. (b)  As part of maintaining the resource bank, the office shall: (1)  Assist researchers who are seeking information about gun violence in the State; (2)  Collaborate with researchers, including organizations that conduct gun violence research, to: (A)  Identify gaps in available data needed for gun violence prevention research and develop strategies to improve relevant data collection the State; (B)  Use existing available research to enhance evidence-based gun violence prevention tools and resources available to communities in the State; and (C)  Improve the understanding of the disproportionate barriers to safety from gun violence by encouraging disaggregation of data by race and ethnicity when research id conducted; and (3)  Promote new and relevant research regarding gun violence prevention and, if possible, make this research accessible to researchers and the public. §   -6  Reporting.  The office shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session that contains a summary of its activities during the preceding year, including: (1)  Grants awarded; (2)  The office's engagement with community entities and other stakeholders; and (3)  Any other findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation. §   ‑7  Rules. The office shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this chapter." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the gun violence prevention special fund. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the gun violence prevention special fund the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the awarding of grants to organizations to conduct community-based gun violence intervention initiatives. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of gun violence prevention for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purposes of this Act, including the hiring of personnel and the establishment of a gun violence resource bank. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of gun violence prevention for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________